Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 5 County Administrators

53-6-35.
Appointment.

The probate court of each county shall appoint a county administrator whose duty shall be to take charge of all estates unrepresented and not likely to be represented.

In all counties of this state the probate court is authorized to appoint, in the same manner as the county administrator is appointed, one or more additional county administrators who shall have the same powers, duties, and authority and be subject to the same laws, including Chapter 8 of Title 29, relating to county guardians, as county administrators.

The order appointing the county administrator shall be entered on the minutes of the probate court and the original shall be placed in the possession of the county administrator.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-35

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 15; Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 8.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, a comma was inserted after “duties” in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2005, and all appointments of guardians of the person or property made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-6-36.
Qualifications and compensation.

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the county administrator shall have attained the age of 21 years and shall have been for at least one year a domiciliary of the county of appointment.

If the individual to be appointed as county administrator is an active member in good standing of the State Bar of Georgia, such individual need not be a domiciliary of the county but only a domiciliary of this state.

If the county governing authority consents, county administrators and ex officio county guardians may be paid an annual fee for so serving. The amount of any such fee shall be established by agreement of the county governing authority, the probate court, and the individual so serving. Any such fee shall be in addition to commissions authorized under other provisions of law.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-36

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-6-37.
Term; vacancies; discharge of duties after expiration of term or removal from office; resignation.

The term of office of a county administrator shall be four years and shall expire on the first Monday in March or when a successor is appointed and qualified. All vacancies in the office, whether by death, resignation, removal from the county, or removal from office, shall be filled by the probate court for the unexpired term.

When the term of a county administrator has expired or when a county administrator has been removed from office, the county administrator shall nevertheless continue to discharge the duties of administrator of all estates remaining in the administrator’s hands unless the letters of administration are revoked.

A county administrator may resign the office as other administrators are allowed by law to do so.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-37

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-6-38.
Administration of unrepresented estate by county administrator.

If for any reason an estate is unrepresented and not likely to be represented, the probate court shall vest the administration of the estate in the county administrator, with notice given as provided for in Code Section 53-6-22. If, however, the estate does not exceed in value the sum set aside to the spouse and children of the decedent as year’s support, no administration shall be necessary, but the probate court shall by order set apart the same to the spouse and children, as provided by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-38

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 459 (2003).

53-6-39.
Administration or unrepresented estate by clerk of superior court.

If for any reason a county has no county administrator and there is an unrepresented estate that is not likely to be represented, it shall be the duty of the probate court of any such county to vest the administration of the estate in the clerk of the superior court of the county.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-39

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-6-40.
Separate letters of administration; governing law; appointment for sole purpose of commencing or continuing lawsuit against estate.

The probate court shall grant to the county administrator separate letters of administration upon each estate placed in the county administrator’s hands. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the county administrator shall be governed and controlled by the law provided for other administrators.

If a petition is made for the appointment of a county administrator as the administrator of an unrepresented estate for the sole purpose of making it possible to commence or continue a lawsuit against the estate and the granting of such petition is otherwise proper under applicable law, the probate court may appoint the county administrator as administrator of such estate. The probate court shall relieve the county administrator from all liabilities, duties, and obligations otherwise imposed on the administrator of an estate, including but not limited to the marshaling of assets, the publication of notice to creditors, the filing of an inventory, the filing of returns, and the posting of a separate bond, except for those duties and obligations directly related to the acceptance of service of process and qualification as administrator and other duties directly related to the lawsuit. Additionally, the probate court may provide for the payment of reasonable compensation to the county administrator by the petitioner sufficient to cover the time devoted to and expenses incurred by the county administrator in the performance of the duties and obligations with respect to the estate, such compensation to be determined by the probate court in the same manner that the amount of any extra compensation claimed by the administrator is to be determined.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-6-41.
Bond.

Each county administrator shall give bond, with good security to be judged by the probate court, in the sum of $5,000.00. The bond shall be payable to the probate court for the benefit of all concerned. It shall be attested by the judge or clerk of the probate court and shall be conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the county administrator’s duty as such, as required by law. Actions on the bond may be brought by any person aggrieved by the misconduct of the county administrator, as provided by law for actions on the bonds of other administrators.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Official bonds generally, T. 45, C. 4.

53-6-42.
Power of court to revoke letters of administration, require additional security, or pass other order.

The probate court may, for good cause shown, as provided in Code Sections 29-3-82, 29-5-92, and 53-7-14, revoke the letters of administration of the county administrator or letters of guardianship of the county administrator, require additional security on the county administrator’s bond, or pass such other order as is expedient and necessary for the good of any particular estate in the hands of any county administrator.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 9.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2005, and all appointments of guardians of the person or property made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

53-6-43.
Proceedings to require additional security.

If, in the opinion of the probate court or upon the petition of an heir, it shall become necessary for the good of any estate placed or about to be placed in the hands of the county administrator for the administrator to give additional security on the bond or to give additional bond with security, the probate court shall have the authority to fix the amount of the bond and shall cite the county administrator to appear at a regular term of the court and show cause, if any, why the additional bond or additional security should not be given.

If, upon the hearing, the county administrator fails to show good cause why the additional bond or additional security should not be given, the probate court shall pass an order fixing the amount of the bond and directing the county administrator to give additional security on or before a day named, which day shall be within 30 days of the date of the order.

Should the county administrator fail, refuse, or neglect to give additional bond or additional security on or before the day fixed in the order of the probate court and fail to show good cause why further time should be allowed, it shall be the duty of the probate court to remove the county administrator and to appoint another for the unexpired term of office. The order of removal shall be recorded as provided for the order of appointment.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-6-44.
Settlement of estate without administration.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to require the probate court to vest administration in the county administrator or any other person when the heirs agree to settle the estate without administration.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.